Wyoming statutes. Title 36 State Lands
Article 1. In General

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

“Compliance with state standards” as requirement to granting right-of-way over federal public lands under § 505(a)(iv) of the Federal Land Policy and Management Act of 1976 (43 USC § 1765(a)(iv)), 60 ALR Fed 386.

§ 36-10-101.
Authority to acquire state lands; reservation of mineral rights.

The United States shall be and is authorized to acquire by purchase or condemnation or otherwise, any land in this state required for public buildings, custom houses, arsenals, national cemeteries, or other purposes essential to the national defense in necessary use of said land by armed naval, air or land forces, or land to be physically occupied by the Boysen Dam, its reservoir, power plant and distribution systems, or lands to be physically occupied by dams, reservoirs, power plants and distribution systems in United States reclamation service projects, and the state of Wyoming hereby consents thereto, provided that the mineral content of lands so acquired, if owners thereof so elect, shall be reserved to such owners.

History.

Laws 1897, ch. 17, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 2657; C.S. 1910, § 697; C.S. 1920, § 810; R.S. 1931, § 118-101; Laws 1941, ch. 97, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 24-801; W.S. 1957, § 36-207.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “State Participation in Federal Policy Making for the Yellowstone Ecosystem: A Meaningful Solution or Business as Usual?,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 397 (1986).

§ 36-10-102.
Jurisdiction ceded to United States.

The jurisdiction of the state of Wyoming in and over any land so acquired by the United States shall be, and the same is hereby ceded to the United States, but the jurisdiction so ceded shall continue no longer than the said United States shall own the said land.

History.

Laws 1897, ch. 17, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 2658; C.S. 1910, § 698; C.S. 1920, § 811; R.S. 1931, § 118-102; C.S. 1945, § 24-802; W.S. 1957, § 36-208.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “State Participation in Federal Policy Making for the Yellowstone Ecosystem: A Meaningful Solution or Business as Usual?,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 397 (1986).

§ 36-10-103.
Retention of concurrent jurisdiction by state.

The said consent is given and the said jurisdiction ceded upon the express condition that the state of Wyoming shall retain concurrent jurisdiction with the United States in and over the said land, so far as that all civil process, in all cases, and such criminal and other process as may issue under the laws or authority of the state of Wyoming against any person or persons charged with crimes or misdemeanors committed within said state, may be executed therein in the same way and manner as if such consent had not been given or jurisdiction ceded, except so far as such process may affect the real or personal property of the United States.

History.

Laws 1897, ch. 17, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 2659; C.S. 1910, § 699; C.S. 1920, § 812; R.S. 1931, § 118-103; C.S. 1945, § 24-803; W.S. 1957, § 36-209.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “State Participation in Federal Policy Making for the Yellowstone Ecosystem: A Meaningful Solution or Business as Usual?,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 397 (1986).

§ 36-10-104.
When jurisdiction vests; exoneration from taxes, assessments and other charges.

The jurisdiction hereby ceded shall not vest until the United States shall have acquired the title to the said lands by purchase or condemnation or otherwise, and so long as the said land shall remain the property of the United States when acquired as aforesaid, and no longer, the same shall be and continue exonerated from all taxes, assessments and other charges which may be levied or imposed under the authority of this state.

History.

Laws 1897, ch. 17, § 4; R.S. 1899, § 2660; C.S. 1910, § 700; C.S. 1920, § 813; R.S. 1931, § 118-104; C.S. 1945, § 24-804; W.S. 1957, § 36-210.

Cross references. —

As to exemption of United States lands from taxation, see art. 21, § 26, Wyo. Const.

§ 36-10-105.
Rights-of-way.

There is hereby granted over all the lands now owned by the state of Wyoming, and which may hereafter be owned by the state of Wyoming, a right-of-way for public utility facilities constructed by and under the authority of the United States. Any right-of-way desired by the United States shall be surveyed and platted and certified maps and plats of the right-of-way filed with the board of land commissioners, the maps and plats to be in conformity with the requirements of W.S.

37-9-201

[repealed], regarding rights-of-way for railroad corporations. No fee other than fair market value for the easements as determined by the board of land commissioners shall be requested for the filing of the maps and plats. All conveyances by the state of any of its lands, which may hereafter be made, shall contain a reservation for rights-of-way provided for in this section granted prior to July 1, 1981.

History.

Laws 1905, ch. 85, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 3890; C.S. 1920, § 4954; R.S. 1931, § 91-404; C.S. 1945, § 24-805; W.S. 1957, § 36-211; Laws 1965, ch. 156, § 1; 1981, ch. 174, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

Section

37-9-201

, referred to in the second sentence in this section, was repealed in 1981.

Lands granted for university purposes, within statute, are “state lands,”

authorizing board to grant rights-of-way across them. Ross v. Trustees of Univ. of Wyo., 30 Wyo. 433, 222 P. 3,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 31 Wyo. 464, 228 P. 642,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1924).

Right to construct and operate irrigation ditches. —

Lands conveyed with provisions for right-of-way to the United States are subject to the right of the United States thereafter to construct and operate irrigation ditches for a reclamation project. Ide v. United States, 263 U.S. 497, 44 S. Ct. 182, 68 L. Ed. 407, 1924 U.S. LEXIS 2813 (U.S. 1924).

§ 36-10-106.
Yellowstone National Park; reservation of jurisdiction by United States.

By section 2 of the Act of Admission of the state of Wyoming, 26 United States Statutes at Large, 222, chapter 664, the United States of America reserved exclusive control and jurisdiction over Yellowstone National Park and future additions to Yellowstone National Park. The boundaries of Yellowstone National Park at the time of admission were defined in 17 United States Statutes at Large 32.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 149, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 36-211.1.

Cross references. —

As to Yellowstone park commission, see §

36-8-201

et seq.

For Act of Admission, see Volume 1 of

Wyoming Statutes Annotated.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “State Participation in Federal Policy Making for the Yellowstone Ecosystem: A Meaningful Solution or Business as Usual?,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 397 (1986).

§ 36-10-107.
Yellowstone National Park; boundary revision.

On March 1, 1929, the congress of the United States by the passage of an act set out in 45 United States Statutes at Large 1435 revised the boundaries of Yellowstone National Park.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 149, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 36-211.2.

§ 36-10-108.
Yellowstone National Park; jurisdiction ceded to state.

By reason of the act of March 1, 1929, as set out in 45 United States Statutes at Large 1435, revising the boundaries of Yellowstone National Park, the United States of America ceded exclusive jurisdiction to the state of Wyoming over that part of Yellowstone National Park which was in the original boundaries of Yellowstone National Park, but which was without the revised boundaries of Yellowstone National Park, upon the acceptance of said exclusive jurisdiction by the state of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 149, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 26-211.3.

§ 36-10-109.
Yellowstone National Park; acceptance of jurisdiction by state.

The state of Wyoming hereby accepts jurisdiction for all purposes whatsoever over the lands included within the original boundaries of Yellowstone National Park as described in 17 United States Statutes at Large 32 but excluded from the revised boundaries of Yellowstone National Park as described in 45 United States Statutes at Large 1435.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 149, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 26-311.4.